Utah statutes.
64-13-1.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Community correctional center" means a nonsecure correctional facility
operated:
(a)  by the department; or
(b)  under a contract with the department.
(2)  "Correctional facility" means any facility operated to house offenders,
either in a secure or nonsecure setting:
(a)  by the department; or
(b)  under a contract with the department.
(3)  "Department" means the Department of Corrections.
(4)  "Emergency" means any riot, disturbance, homicide, inmate violence
occurring in any correctional facility, or any situation that presents
immediate danger to the safety, security, and control of the department.
(5)  "Executive director" means the executive director of the Department of
Corrections.
(6)  "Inmate" means any person who is committed to the custody of the
department and who is housed at a correctional facility or at a county jail at
the request of the department.
(7)  "Offender" means any person who has been convicted of a crime for which
he may be committed to the custody of the department and is at least one of
the following:
(a)  committed to the custody of the department;
(b)  on probation; or
(c)  on parole.
(8)  "Secure correctional facility" means any prison, penitentiary, or other
institution operated by the department or under contract for the confinement
of offenders, where force may be used to restrain them if they attempt to
leave the institution without authorization.
